Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.190

Payments to be made monthly.

A pension annuity or a retirement allowance granted under the provisions of this chapter, unless otherwise specified herein, shall be payable in monthly installments, and each installment shall cover for the current calendar month.

[ 1939 c 207 s 20; RRS s 9592-120.]